Maryland, session 2025, HB0085.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0085*

HOUSE BILL 85
Article – Criminal Procedure
[5–104.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Civil immigration violation” means a violation of federal civil
immigration law.
(3) “Family member” means a relative by blood, adoption, or marriage.
(4) “Household member” means a person who lives with another or is a
regular presence in the home of another.
(5) (i) “Law enforcement agent” means an individual who is certified by
the Maryland Police Training and Standards Commission under § 3–209 of the Public
Safety Article.
(ii) “Law enforcement agent” does not include an agent or employee
of a State correctional facility or a local correctional facility.
(6) “Local correctional facility” has the meaning stated in § 1–101 of the
Correctional Services Article.
(7) “State correctional facility” has the meaning stated in § 1–101 of the
Correctional Services Article.
(b) (1) In this subsection, “arrest” does not include a routine booking
procedure.
(2) Except as provided in paragraphs (3) and (4) of this subsection, a law
enforcement agent may not, during the performance of regular police functions:
(i) inquire about an individual’s citizenship, immigration status, or
place of birth during a stop, a search, or an arrest;
(ii) detain, or prolong the detention of, an individual:
1. for the purpose of investigating the individual’s
citizenship or immigration status; or
2. based on the suspicion that the individual has committed
a civil immigration violation;
(iii) transfer an individual to federal immigration authorities unless
required by federal law; or

HOUSE BILL 85 3
(iv) coerce, intimidate, or threaten any individual based on the actual
or perceived citizenship or immigration status of the individual or:
1. the individual’s family member;
2. the individual’s household member;
3. the individual’s legal guardian; or
4. another individual for whom the individual is a legal
guardian.
(3) Nothing in this subsection shall prevent a law enforcement agent from
inquiring about any information that is material to a criminal investigation.
(4) If the citizenship or immigration status of an individual is relevant to a
protection accorded to the individual under State or federal law, or subject to a requirement
imposed by international treaty, a law enforcement agent may:
(i) notify the individual of the protection or requirement; and
(ii) provide the individual an opportunity to voluntarily disclose the
individual’s citizenship or immigration status for the purpose of receiving the protection or
complying with the requirement.]
Article – Local Government
SUBTITLE 16. SANCTUARY POLICIES.
1–1601.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “CRIME OF VIOLENCE” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 14–101 OF THE
CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE.
(C) “LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 3–201
OF THE PUBLIC SAFETY ARTICLE.
(D) “LOCAL GOVERNMENT ENTITY” MEANS A GOVERNING BODY, BOARD,
COMMISSION, COMMITTEE, DEPARTMENT, OR LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY OF A
COUNTY OR MUNICIPALITY.

HOUSE BILL 85
(E) “LOCAL GOVERNMENT OFFICIAL” MEANS AN AGENT, EMPLOYEE,
MEMBER, OR REPRESENTATIVE OF A COUNTY OR MUNICIPALITY.
(F) “SANCTUARY POLICY” MEANS A DIRECTIVE, ORDER, ORDINANCE,
LOCAL LAW, RESOLUTION, PRACTICE, OR POLICY, WHETHER FORMALLY ENACTED,
INFORMALLY ADOPTED, OR OTHERWISE EFFECTUATED, THAT:
(1) LIMITS OR PROHIBITS ANY LOCAL GOVERNMENT ENTITY OR
OFFICIAL FROM COMMUNICATING OR COOPERATING WITH FEDERAL IMMIGRATION
AUTHORITIES TO VERIFY OR REPORT THE IMMIGRATION STATUS OF ANY
INDIVIDUAL;
(2) GRANTS TO INDIVIDUALS UNLAWFULLY PRESENT IN THE UNITED
STATES THE RIGHT TO LAWFUL PRESENCE WITHIN THE BOUNDARIES OF THE STATE
IN VIOLATION OF FEDERAL LAW;
(3) VIOLATES 8 U.S.C. § 1373;
(4) RESTRICTS IN ANY WAY, OR IMPOSES ANY CONDITIONS ON, A
LOCAL GOVERNMENT ENTITY’S COOPERATION WITH DETAINERS FROM FEDERAL
IMMIGRATION AUTHORITIES TO MAINTAIN CUSTODY OF ANY INDIVIDUAL OR TO
TRANSFER ANY INDIVIDUAL TO THE CUSTODY OF FEDERAL IMMIGRATION
AUTHORITIES;
(5) REQUIRES FEDERAL IMMIGRATION AUTHORITIES TO OBTAIN A
WARRANT OR DEMONSTRATE PROBABLE CAUSE BEFORE COMPLYING WITH
DETAINERS TO MAINTAIN CUSTODY OF ANY INDIVIDUAL OR TRANSFER ANY
INDIVIDUAL TO THE CUSTODY OF FEDERAL IMMIGRATION AUTHORITIES; OR
(6) PROHIBITS LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCIES FROM INQUIRING AS
TO THE CITIZENSHIP OR IMMIGRATION STATUS OF ANY INDIVIDUAL.
1–1602.
(A) A COUNTY OR MUNICIPALITY MAY NOT ADOPT, ENACT, OR ENFORCE A
SANCTUARY POLICY.
(B) A COUNTY OR MUNICIPALITY SHALL FULLY COOPERATE WITH FEDERAL
IMMIGRATION AUTHORITIES REGARDING ANY INDIVIDUAL UNLAWFULLY PRESENT
IN THE UNITED STATES WHO HAS BEEN CONVICTED OF A CRIME OF VIOLENCE.

HOUSE BILL 85 5
(C) A COUNTY OR MUNICIPALITY THAT VIOLATES THIS SECTION IS
INELIGIBLE FOR STATE FUNDS UNTIL THE COUNTY OR MUNICIPALITY COMES INTO
COMPLIANCE WITH THIS SECTION.
1–1603.
(A) A RESIDENT OF THE STATE THAT BELIEVES A COUNTY OR
MUNICIPALITY IS IN VIOLATION OF THIS SUBTITLE MAY SUBMIT A COMPLAINT TO
THE ATTORNEY GENERAL.
(B) ON RECEIPT OF A COMPLAINT UNDER THIS SECTION, THE ATTORNEY
GENERAL SHALL ISSUE AN OPINION STATING WHETHER THE COUNTY OR
MUNICIPALITY IS IN VIOLATION OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(C) IF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL ISSUES AN OPINION STATING THAT A
COUNTY OR MUNICIPALITY IS IN VIOLATION OF THIS SUBTITLE, THE COUNTY OR
MUNICIPALITY SHALL BE INELIGIBLE TO RECEIVE STATE FUNDS UNTIL THE
ATTORNEY GENERAL CERTIFIES THAT THE COUNTY OR MUNICIPALITY HAS COME
INTO COMPLIANCE WITH THIS SUBTITLE.
(D) A COUNTY OR MUNICIPALITY MAY APPEAL A DECISION OF THE
ATTORNEY GENERAL UNDER THIS SUBSECTION TO THE APPROPRIATE CIRCUIT
COURT.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.